Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.190

Violations—Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter and for which a penalty is not provided shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars for each day of the violation, or may be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding six months.

[ 1987 c 214 s 15; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 208: See RCW 18.73.910.